Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGRICULTURAL UTILIZATION RESEARCH INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin $4,518,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,518,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Agricultural Utilization Research Institute for the purposes of carrying out the duties under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116V. new text end